Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle E. Merger, Consolidation, Transfer of Assets.

§ 81-27-6.401.
Merger authority.

With the prior written approval of the commissioner, a state trust company may merge or consolidate with another person to the same extent as a business corporation under the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, subject to this subarticle.

Implementation of the plan of merger by the parties and approval of the board, shareholders, participants, or owners of the parties must be made or obtained as provided by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act as if the state trust company were a domestic corporation and all other parties to the merger were foreign corporations and other entities, except as otherwise provided by rules or regulations adopted under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.402.
Merger application.

The original articles of merger, a number of copies of the articles of merger equal to the number of surviving, new, and acquiring entities, and an application in the form required by the commissioner must be filed with the commissioner. The commissioner shall investigate the condition of the merging parties. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

The commissioner may approve the merger if:

Each resulting state trust company will be solvent and have adequate capitalization for its business and location;

Each resulting state trust company has in all respects complied with the statutes and rules relative to the organization of a state trust company;

All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of each state trust company that is a party to the merger have been properly discharged or otherwise lawfully assumed or retained by a state trust company or other fiduciary;

Each surviving, new, or acquiring person that is not authorized to engage in the trust business will not engage in the trust business and has in all respects complied with the laws of this state; and

All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been satisfied or otherwise resolved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.403.
Approval of commissioner.

If the commissioner approves the merger and finds that all required filing fees and investigative costs have been paid, the commissioner shall:

Endorse the face of the original and each copy with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;

File the original in the department’s records; and

Deliver a certified copy of the articles of merger to each surviving, new, or acquiring entity.

A merger is effective on the date of approval, unless the merger agreement provides and the commissioner consents to a different effective date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.404.
Rights of dissenters to mergers.

A shareholder, participant, or participant-transferee may dissent from the merger to the extent and by following the procedure provided by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act or rules or regulations adopted under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.405.
Authority to act as disbursing agent.

The purchasing trust institution may hold the purchase price and any additional funds delivered to it by the selling institution in trust for the selling institution and may act as agent of the selling institution in disbursing those funds in trust by paying the creditors of the selling institution. If the purchasing trust institution acts under written contract of agency approved by the commissioner that specifically names each creditor and the amount to be paid each, and if the agency as limited to the purely ministerial act of paying creditors the amounts due them as determined by the selling institution and reflected in the contract of agency and does not involve discretionary duties or authority other than the identification of the creditors named, the purchasing trust institution:

May rely on the contract of agency and the instructions included in it; and

Is not responsible for:

Any error made by the selling institution in determining its liabilities, and creditors to whom the liabilities are due, or the amounts due the creditors; or

Any preference that results from the payments made under the contract of agency and the instructions included in it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.406.
Liquidation of selling state trust company.

If the selling trust institution is at any time after the sale of assets voluntarily or involuntarily closed for liquidation by a state or federal regulatory agency, the purchasing trust company shall pay to the receiver of the selling institution the balance of the funds held by it in trust for the selling institution and not yet paid to the creditors of the selling institution. Without further action the purchasing trust institution is discharged of all responsibilities to the selling institution, its receiver, or its creditors, shareholders, or participants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.407.
Payment to creditors.

Payment to a creditor of the selling institution of the amount to be paid the person under the terms of the contract of agency may be made by the purchasing trust company by opening an agency account in the name of the creditor, crediting the account with the amount to be paid the creditor under the terms of the agency contract, and mailing or personally delivering a duplicate ticket evidencing the credit to the creditor at the person’s address shown in the records of the selling institution. The relationship between the purchasing trust institution and the creditor is that of agent to creditor only to the extent of the credit reflected by the ticket.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.408.
Sale of assets.

The board of a state trust company, with the commissioner’s approval, may cause a state trust company to sell all or substantially all of its assets, including the right to control accounts established with the trust company, without shareholder or participant approval if the commissioner finds:

The interests of the state trust company’s clients, depositors, and creditors are jeopardized because of insolvency or imminent insolvency of the state trust company; and

The sale is in the best interest of the state trust company’s clients and creditors; and

The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor approves the transaction unless the deposits of the state trust company are not insured.

Fees and assessments due the department.

A sale under this section must include an assumption and promise by the buyer to pay or otherwise discharge:

All of the state trust company’s liabilities to clients and depositors;

All of the state trust company’s liabilities for salaries of the state trust company’s employees incurred before the date of the sale;

Obligations incurred by the commissioner arising out of the supervision or sale of the state trust company; and

This section does not limit the incidental power of a state trust company to buy and sell assets in the ordinary course of business.

This section does not affect the commissioner’s right to take action under another law. The sale by a trust company of all or substantially all of its assets with shareholder or participant approval is considered a voluntary dissolution and liquidation and is governed by Section 81-5-101.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.